Illinois, session 104th, HB5584.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-40 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/3-40)7    Sec. 3-40. Compensation of supervisors of assessments. 8    (a) A supervisor of assessments shall receive annual 9compensation in an amount fixed by the county board subject to 10the following minimum amounts: 11        In counties with less than 14,000 inhabitants, not 12    less than $7,500; 13        In counties with 14,000 or more but less than 30,000 14    inhabitants, not less than $8,000; 15        In counties with 30,000 or more but less than 60,000 16    inhabitants, not less than $9,000; 17        In counties with 60,000 or more but less than 100,000 18    inhabitants, not less than $10,000; 19        In counties with 100,000 or more but less than 200,000 20    inhabitants, not less than $11,500; 21        In counties with 200,000 or more but less than 300,000 22    inhabitants, not less than $13,000; 23        In counties with 300,000 or more but less than   HB5584- 2 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    1,000,000 inhabitants, not less than $15,000.2For purposes of this subsection, the number of inhabitants 3shall be determined by the latest Federal decennial or special 4census of the county.5    (b) Elected supervisors of assessments who began a term of 6office before December 1, 1990 shall be compensated at the 7rate of their base salary. "Base salary" is the compensation 8paid for their position before July 1, 1989.9    (c) Elected supervisors of assessments beginning a term of 10office on or after December 1, 1990 shall, beginning December 111, 1993, receive their base salary plus at least 12% of base 12salary. Elected and appointed supervisors of assessments who 13began a term of office on or after December 1, 2026 shall be 14paid a salary in an amount equal to 80% of the amount paid to 15the State's Attorney of the county that employs the elected or 16appointed supervisor of assessments. 17    Any supervisor of assessments who has been presented a 18Certified Assessing Evaluator Certificate by the International 19Association of Assessing Officers shall receive an additional 20compensation of $500 per year to be paid out of funds 21appropriated to the Department from the Personal Property Tax 22Replacement Fund.23    The salary set by the county board shall be paid in equal 24monthly installments out of the treasury of the county in 25which he or she is appointed or elected. If the Department has 26determined that the total assessed value of property in a   HB5584- 3 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1county, as equalized by the supervisor of assessments under 2Section 9-210, is between 31 1/3% and 35 1/3% of the total fair 3cash value of property in the county, subject to 4appropriation, the Department shall reimburse the county 5monthly from the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund or the 6General Revenue Fund 50% of the amount of salary the county 7paid to the officer for the preceding month, until November 830, 2026, and 66 2/3% of the amount of salary the county paid 9to the officer for the preceding month beginning December 1, 102026.11    The county board shall provide necessary office space for 12the officer and pay all necessary expenses of the office out of 13the county treasury.14    Each supervisor of assessments may, with the advice and 15consent of the county board, appoint necessary deputies and 16clerks, their compensation to be fixed by the county board and 17paid by the county.18(Source: P.A. 97-72, eff. 7-1-11.) 19    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 20Sections 4-6001 and 4-6002 and by adding Sections 4-6005 and 214-8003 as follows: 22    (55 ILCS 5/4-6001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-6001)23    Sec. 4-6001. Officers in counties of less than 2,000,000. 24    (a) In all counties of less than 2,000,000 inhabitants,   HB5584- 4 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1the compensation of Coroners, County Treasurers, County 2Clerks, Recorders and Auditors shall be determined under this 3Section until November 30, 2026. The County Board in those 4counties shall fix the amount of the necessary clerk hire, 5stationery, fuel and other expenses of those officers. The 6compensation of those officers shall be separate from the 7necessary clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses, and 8such compensation (except for coroners in those counties with 9less than 2,000,000 population in which the coroner's 10compensation is set in accordance with Section 4-6002) shall 11be fixed within the following limits:12    To each such officer in counties containing less than 1314,000 inhabitants, not less than $13,500 per annum.14    To each such officer in counties containing 14,000 or more 15inhabitants, but less than 30,000 inhabitants, not less than 16$14,500 per annum.17    To each such officer in counties containing 30,000 or more 18inhabitants but less than 60,000 inhabitants, not less than 19$15,000 per annum.20    To each such officer in counties containing 60,000 or more 21inhabitants but less than 100,000 inhabitants, not less than 22$15,000 per annum.23    To each such officer in counties containing 100,000 or 24more inhabitants but less than 200,000 inhabitants, not less 25than $16,500 per annum.26    To each such officer in counties containing 200,000 or   HB5584- 5 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1more inhabitants but less than 300,000 inhabitants, not less 2than $18,000 per annum.3    To each such officer in counties containing 300,000 or 4more inhabitants but less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, not less 5than $20,000 per annum.6    (b) Those officers beginning a term of office before 7December 1, 1990 shall be compensated at the rate of their base 8salary. "Base salary" is the compensation paid for each of 9those offices, respectively, before July 1, 1989.10    (c) Those officers beginning a term of office on or after 11December 1, 1990 shall be compensated as follows:12        (1) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 13    least 3% of base salary.14        (2) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 15    least 6% of base salary.16        (3) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 17    least 9% of base salary.18        (4) Beginning December 1, 1993, base salary plus at 19    least 12% of base salary.20    (d) In addition to but separate and apart from the 21compensation provided in this Section, the county clerk of 22each county, the recorder of each county, and the chief clerk 23of each county board of election commissioners shall receive 24an award as follows:25        (1) $4,500 per year after January 1, 1998;26        (2) $5,500 per year after January 1, 1999; and  HB5584- 6 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1        (3) $6,500 per year after January 1, 2000.2The total amount required for such awards each year shall be 3appropriated by the General Assembly to the State Board of 4Elections which shall distribute the awards in annual lump sum 5payments to the several county clerks, recorders, and chief 6election clerks. Beginning December 1, 1990, this annual 7award, and any other award or stipend paid out of State funds 8to county officers, shall not affect any other compensation 9provided by law to be paid to county officers.10    For State fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2024, 11the State Board of Elections shall remit to each county the 12amount required for the stipend under this subsection. That 13money shall be deposited by the county treasurer into a fund 14dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll clerk shall pay 15the stipend as required by this subsection within 10 business 16days after those funds are deposited into the county fund. The 17stipend shall not be considered part of the recipient's base 18compensation and must be remitted to the recipient in addition 19to the recipient's annual salary or compensation. Beginning 20July 1, 2024, the county shall be responsible for the State and 21federal income tax reporting and withholding as well as the 22employer contributions under the Illinois Pension Code on the 23stipend under this subsection. 24    (e) Beginning December 1, 1990, no county board may reduce 25or otherwise impair the compensation payable from county funds 26to a county officer if the reduction or impairment is the   HB5584- 7 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1result of the county officer receiving an award or stipend 2payable from State funds.3    (f) The compensation, necessary clerk hire, stationery, 4fuel and other expenses of the county auditor, as fixed by the 5county board, shall be paid by the county.6    (g) The population of all counties for the purpose of 7fixing compensation, as herein provided, shall be based upon 8the last Federal census immediately previous to the election 9of the officer in question in each county.10    (h) With respect to an auditor who takes office on or after 11the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General 12Assembly, the auditor shall receive an annual stipend of 13$6,500 per year. The General Assembly shall appropriate the 14total amount required for the stipend each year from the 15Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of 16Revenue, and the Department of Revenue shall distribute the 17awards in an annual lump sum payment to each county auditor. 18The stipend shall be in addition to, but separate and apart 19from, the compensation provided in this Section. No county 20board may reduce or otherwise impair the compensation payable 21from county funds to the auditor if the reduction or 22impairment is the result of the auditor receiving an award or 23stipend pursuant to this subsection. 24    Except as provided under subsection (d), for State fiscal 25years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, the Department shall 26remit to each county the amount required for the stipend under   HB5584- 8 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1this Section. That money shall be deposited by the county 2treasurer into a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county 3payroll clerk shall pay the stipend to the auditor within 10 4business days after those funds are deposited into the county 5fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of the 6auditor's base compensation and must be remitted to the 7auditor in addition to the auditor's annual salary or 8compensation. Beginning July 1, 2023, the county shall be 9responsible for the State and federal income tax reporting and 10withholding as well as the employer contributions under the 11Illinois Pension Code on the stipend under this Section. 12(Source: P.A. 103-318, eff. 7-28-23; 103-607, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    (55 ILCS 5/4-6002)  (from Ch. 34, par. 4-6002)14    Sec. 4-6002. Coroners in counties of less than 2,000,000. 15    (a) Through November 30, 2026, the The County Board, in 16all counties of less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, shall fix the 17compensation of Coroners within the limitations fixed by this 18Division, and shall appropriate for their necessary clerk 19hire, stationery, fuel, supplies, and other expenses. The 20compensation of the Coroner shall be fixed separately from his 21necessary clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses, and 22such compensation shall be fixed within the following limits:23    To each Coroner in counties containing less than 5,000 24inhabitants, not less than $4,500 per annum.25    To each Coroner in counties containing 5,000 or more   HB5584- 9 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1inhabitants but less than 14,000 inhabitants, not less than 2$6,000 per annum.3    To each Coroner in counties containing 14,000 or more 4inhabitants, but less than 30,000 inhabitants, not less than 5$9,000 per annum.6    To each Coroner in counties containing 30,000 or more 7inhabitants, but less than 60,000 inhabitants, not less than 8$14,000 per annum.9    To each Coroner in counties containing 60,000 or more 10inhabitants, but less than 100,000 inhabitants, not less than 11$15,000 per annum.12    To each Coroner in counties containing 100,000 or more 13inhabitants, but less than 200,000 inhabitants, not less than 14$16,500 per annum.15    To each Coroner in counties containing 200,000 or more 16inhabitants, but less than 300,000 inhabitants, not less than 17$18,000 per annum.18    To each Coroner in counties containing 300,000 or more 19inhabitants, but less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, not less 20than $20,000 per annum.21    The population of all counties for the purpose of fixing 22compensation, as herein provided, shall be based upon the last 23Federal census immediately previous to the election of the 24Coroner in question in each county. This Section does not 25apply to a county which has abolished the elective office of 26coroner.  HB5584- 10 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    (b) Those coroners beginning a term of office on or after 2December 1, 1990 shall be compensated as follows:3        (1) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 4    least 3% of base salary.5        (2) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 6    least 6% of base salary.7        (3) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 8    least 9% of base salary.9        (4) Beginning December 1, 1993, base salary plus at 10    least 12% of base salary.11    "Base salary", as used in this subsection (b), means the 12salary in effect before July 1, 1989.13    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from, the 14compensation provided in this Section, subject to 15appropriation, the coroner of each county shall receive an 16annual stipend of $6,500 to be paid by the Illinois Department 17of Revenue out of the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund 18if his or her term begins on or after December 1, 2000.19    For State fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, 20the Department shall remit to each county the amount required 21for the stipend under this subsection. That money shall be 22deposited by the county treasurer into a fund dedicated for 23that purpose. The county payroll clerk shall pay the stipend 24to the coroner within 10 business days after those funds are 25deposited into the county fund. The stipend shall not be 26considered part of the coroner's base compensation and must be   HB5584- 11 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1remitted to the coroner in addition to the coroner's annual 2salary or compensation. Beginning July 1, 2023, the county 3shall be responsible for the State and federal income tax 4reporting and withholding as well as the employer 5contributions under the Illinois Pension Code on the stipend 6received under this subsection. 7(Source: P.A. 103-318, eff. 7-28-23.) 8    (55 ILCS 5/4-6005 new)9    Sec. 4-6005. Officers in counties with fewer than 102,000,000 inhabitants. 11    (a) Beginning December 1, 2026, the compensation of 12coroners, county treasurers, county clerks, recorders, and 13auditors in counties with fewer than 2,000,000 inhabitants 14shall be determined under this Section. The county board in 15the counties shall fix the amount of the necessary staff hire, 16stationery, fuel, and other expenses of those officers. The 17compensation of an officer shall be separate from the 18necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and other expenses. 19The compensation of an officer shall be equal to 80% of the 20amount paid to the State's Attorney of the officer's county. 21The officers shall be paid out of the county treasury. For 22part-time coroners, compensation shall be prorated based on a 23fraction, with the numerator being the number of hours worked 24in the pay period and the denominator being the number of 25business days in the pay period times 8 hours.  HB5584- 12 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    (b) The State must pay 66 2/3% of each officer's annual 2salary. Subject to appropriation, the amounts furnished by the 3State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal Property 4Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to the county 5in which each officer is employed (i) by the State Board of 6Elections for the compensation of county clerks, recorders, 7and chief election clerks, or (ii) by the Department of 8Revenue for the compensation of county auditors, coroners and 9treasurers. The necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and 10other expenses, as fixed by the county board, shall be paid by 11the county.12    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from the 13compensation provided in this Section, beginning with fiscal 14year ending on June 30, 2027, the county clerk, recorder, 15auditor, coroner, and treasurer of each county, and the chief 16clerk of each county board of election commissioners, shall 17receive a stipend in the amount of $12,800, adjusted annually 18as provided in subsection (d). The annual award, and any other 19award or stipend paid out of State funds, shall not affect any 20other compensation provided by law to be paid to county 21officers.22        (1) The total amount required for moneys paid under 23    this subsection for the county clerks, recorders, and 24    chief election clerks shall be appropriated by the General 25    Assembly to the State Board of Elections, which shall 26    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each   HB5584- 13 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    county.2        (2) The total amount required for moneys paid under 3    this subsection each year for the county auditors, 4    coroners, and treasurers shall be appropriated by the 5    General Assembly to the Department of Revenue, which shall 6    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 7    county.8        (3) The total amount required for moneys paid under 9    this subsection for the circuit court clerks each year 10    shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the 11    Supreme Court, which shall distribute the awards in annual 12    lump sum payments to each county.13        (4) The amounts required for moneys paid under this 14    subsection shall be deposited by the county treasurer into 15    a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll 16    clerk shall pay the stipend to each officer within 10 17    business days after those funds are deposited into the 18    county fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of 19    the officer's base compensation and must be paid to the 20    officer in addition to the officer's annual salary or 21    compensation. The county shall be responsible for the 22    State and federal income tax reporting and withholding, as 23    well as the employer contributions under the Illinois 24    Pension Code, on the stipend received under this 25    subsection.26    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each   HB5584- 14 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1subsequent year, the moneys paid under subsection (c) shall be 2increased by an amount equal to the percentage increase, if 3any, in the wage and salary report information for state 4government workers and local government workers as reported by 5the Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the 12 months ending in 6March of the year in which the increase takes place. The 7percentage increase shall:8        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state 9    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 10    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;11        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 12    information for state and local government workers for the 13    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 14    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and15        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 16    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 17    preceding-year average determined under item (2).18    The stipend shall be rounded to the nearest $25 increment. 19    (55 ILCS 5/4-8003 new)20    Sec. 4-8003. Officers in counties with more than 2,000,000 21inhabitants. 22    (a) Beginning December 1, 2026, the compensation of 23coroners, county treasurers, county clerks, recorders, and 24auditors in counties with more than 2,000,000 inhabitants 25shall be determined under this Section. The county board in   HB5584- 15 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1the counties shall fix the amount of the necessary staff hire, 2stationery, fuel, and other expenses of those officers. The 3compensation of an officer shall be separate from the 4necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and other expenses. 5The compensation of an officer shall be equal to 80% of the 6amount paid to the State's Attorney of the officer's county. 7The officers shall be paid out of the county treasury.8    (b) The State must pay 66 2/3% of each officer's annual 9salary. Subject to appropriation, the amounts furnished by the 10State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal Property 11Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund to the county 12in which each officer is employed (i) by the State Board of 13Elections for the compensation of county clerks, recorders, 14and chief election clerks, or (ii) by the Department of 15Revenue for the compensation of county auditors, coroners and 16treasurers. The necessary staff hire, stationery, fuel, and 17other expenses, as fixed by the county board, shall be paid by 18the county.19    (c) In addition to, but separate and apart from the 20compensation provided in this Section, beginning with fiscal 21year ending on June 30, 2027, the county clerk, recorder, 22auditor, coroner, and treasurer of each county, and the chief 23clerk of each county board of election commissioners, shall 24receive a stipend in the amount of $12,800, adjusted annually 25as provided in subsection (d). The annual award, and any other 26award or stipend paid out of State funds, shall not affect any   HB5584- 16 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1other compensation provided by law to be paid to county 2officers.3        (1) The total amount required for moneys paid under 4    this subsection for the county clerks, recorders, and 5    chief election clerks shall be appropriated by the General 6    Assembly to the State Board of Elections, which shall 7    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 8    county.9        (2) The total amount required for moneys paid under 10    this subsection each year for the county auditors, 11    coroners, and treasurers shall be appropriated by the 12    General Assembly to the Department of Revenue, which shall 13    distribute the awards in annual lump sum payments to each 14    county.15        (3) The total amount required for moneys paid under 16    this subsection for the circuit court clerks each year 17    shall be appropriated by the General Assembly to the 18    Supreme Court, which shall distribute the awards in annual 19    lump sum payments to each county.20        (4) The amounts required for moneys paid under this 21    subsection shall be deposited by the county treasurer into 22    a fund dedicated for that purpose. The county payroll 23    clerk shall pay the stipend to each officer within 10 24    business days after those funds are deposited into the 25    county fund. The stipend shall not be considered part of 26    the officer's base compensation and must be paid to the   HB5584- 17 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    officer in addition to the officer's annual salary or 2    compensation. The county shall be responsible for the 3    State and federal income tax reporting and withholding, as 4    well as the employer contributions under the Illinois 5    Pension Code, on the stipend received under this 6    subsection.7    (d) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each 8subsequent year, the moneys paid under subsection (c) shall be 9increased by an amount equal to the percentage increase, if 10any, in the wage and salary report information for state 11government workers and local government workers as reported by 12the Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the 12 months ending in 13March of the year in which the increase takes place. The 14percentage increase shall:15        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state 16    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 17    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;18        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 19    information for state and local government workers for the 20    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 21    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and22        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 23    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 24    preceding-year average determined under item (2).25    The stipend shall be rounded to the nearest $25 increment.   HB5584- 18 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    Section 15. The Clerks of Courts Act is amended by 2changing Section 27.3 as follows: 3    (705 ILCS 105/27.3)  (from Ch. 25, par. 27.3)4    Sec. 27.3. Compensation. 5    (a) The county board shall provide the compensation of 6Clerks of the Circuit Court, and the amount necessary for 7clerk hire, stationery, fuel and other expenses. Beginning 8December 1, 1989, the compensation per annum for Clerks of the 9Circuit Court shall be as follows:10    In counties where the population is:11Less than 14,000.......................at least $13,5001214,001-30,000..........................at least $14,5001330,001-60,000..........................at least $15,0001460,001-100,000.........................at least $15,00015100,001-200,000........................at least $16,50016200,001-300,000........................at least $18,00017300,001- 3,000,000.....................at least $20,00018Over 3,000,000.........................at least $55,00019    (b) In counties in which the population is 3,000,000 or 20less, "base salary" is the compensation paid for each Clerk of 21the Circuit Court, respectively, before July 1, 1989.22    (c) The Clerks of the Circuit Court, in counties in which 23the population is 3,000,000 or less, shall be compensated as 24follows:25        (1) Beginning December 1, 1989, base salary plus at   HB5584- 19 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    least 3% of base salary.2        (2) Beginning December 1, 1990, base salary plus at 3    least 6% of base salary.4        (3) Beginning December 1, 1991, base salary plus at 5    least 9% of base salary.6        (4) Beginning December 1, 1992, base salary plus at 7    least 12% of base salary.8    (d) Beginning December 1, 2026, the annual compensation 9for Clerks of the Circuit Court shall be an amount equal to 80% 10of the amount paid to the State's Attorney of the clerk's 11county. The Clerks of the Circuit Court shall be paid out of 12the county treasury. The State must pay 66 2/3% of the annual 13salary. Subject to appropriation, these amounts furnished by 14the State shall be payable monthly out of the Personal 15Property Tax Replacement Fund or the General Revenue Fund by 16the Supreme Court to the counties. 17    (e) In addition to the compensation provided by the county 18board, each Clerk of the Circuit Court shall receive an award 19from the State for the additional duties imposed by Sections 205-9-1 and 5-9-1.2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, Section 2110 of the Violent Crime Victims Assistance Act, and other 22laws, in the following amount:23        (1) $3,500 per year before January 1, 1997.24        (2) $4,500 per year beginning January 1, 1997.25        (3) $5,500 per year beginning January 1, 1998.26        (4) $6,500 per year beginning January 1, 1999.  HB5584- 20 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1        (5) $12,800 per year beginning with fiscal year ending 2    on June 30, 2027, adjusted annually as provided in 3    subsection (g). 4The total amount required for such awards shall be 5appropriated each year by the General Assembly to the Supreme 6Court, which shall distribute such awards in annual lump sum 7payments to the Clerks of the Circuit Court in all counties. 8This annual award, and any other award or stipend paid out of 9State funds to the Clerks of the Circuit Court, shall not 10affect any other compensation provided by law to be paid to 11Clerks of the Circuit Court.12    (e) (Blank).13    (f) No county board may reduce or otherwise impair the 14compensation payable from county funds to a Clerk of the 15Circuit Court if the reduction or impairment is the result of 16the Clerk of the Circuit Court receiving an award or stipend 17payable from State funds.18    (g) Beginning on July 1, 2027, and on July 1 of each 19subsequent year, the stipend in subsection (e) shall be 20increased by an amount equal to the percentage increase, if 21any, in the wage and salary report information for State and 22local government workers, as reported by the Bureau of Labor 23Statistics, for the 12 months ending in March of the year in 24which the increase takes place. The percentage increase shall 25be calculated as follows:26        (1) determine the average wage and salary for state   HB5584- 21 -LRB104 20761 WRO 34265 b1    and local government workers for the full 12 months ending 2    in March of the year in which the increase takes place;3        (2) determine the average wage and salary report 4    information for state and local government workers for the 5    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 6    preceding the year in which the increase takes place; and7        (3) compute the percentage increase, if any, in the 8    current-year average determined under item (1) over the 9    preceding-year average determined under item (2).10(Source: P.A. 100-987, eff. 7-1-19.)